Utah statutes.
38-6-1.   Notice by recording with county recorder.
Notices of liens for taxes payable to the United States of America, other
federal liens created under acts of Congress or regulations adopted pursuant
to those acts, and certificates discharging those liens, shall be recorded in
the office of the county recorder of the county within which any property
subject to the lien is situated.
